Ohio, session 136, HB854.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That sections 319.202, 319.54, 5747.02, 5747.03, and 5747.07 be amended and section 3345.012 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 319.202. Before the county auditor indorses any real property conveyance or manufactured or mobile home conveyance presented to the auditor pursuant to section 319.20 of the Revised Code or registers any manufactured or mobile home conveyance pursuant to section 4503.061 of the Revised Code, the grantee or the grantee's representative shall submit, either electronically or three written copies of, a statement, in the form prescribed by the tax commissioner, and other information as the county auditor may require, declaring the value of real property or manufactured or mobile home conveyed, except that when the transfer is exempt under division (G)(3) of section 319.54 of the Revised Code only a statement of the reason for the exemption shall be required. Each statement submitted under this section shall contain the information required under divisions (A) and (B) of this section. (A) Each statement submitted under this section shall either: (1) Contain an affirmation by the grantee that the grantor has been asked by the grantee or the grantee's representative whether to the best of the grantor's knowledge either the preceding or the current year's taxes on the real property or the current or following year's taxes on the manufactured or mobile home conveyed will be reduced under division (A) of section 323.152 or under section 4503.065 of the Revised Code and that the grantor indicated that to the best of the grantor's knowledge the taxes will not be so reduced; or (2) Be accompanied by a sworn or affirmed instrument stating: (a) To the best of the grantor's knowledge the real property or the manufactured or mobile home that is the subject of the conveyance is eligible for and will receive a reduction in taxes for or payable in the current year under division (A) of section 323.152 or under section 4503.065 of the Revised Code and that the reduction or reductions will be reflected in the grantee's taxes; (b) The estimated amount of such reductions that will be reflected in the grantee's taxes; (c) That the grantor and the grantee have considered and accounted for the total estimated amount of such reductions to the satisfaction of both the grantee and the grantor. The auditor shall indorse the instrument, return it to the grantee or the grantee's representative, and provide a copy of the indorsed instrument to the grantor or the grantor's representative. (B) Each statement submitted under this section shall either: (1) Contain an affirmation by the grantee that the grantor has been asked by the grantee or the grantee's representative whether to the best of the grantor's knowledge the real property conveyed qualified for the current agricultural use valuation under section 5713.30 of the Revised Code either for the preceding or the current year and that the grantor indicated that to the best of the grantor's knowledge the property conveyed was not so qualified; or (2) Be accompanied by a sworn or affirmed instrument stating: (a) To the best of the grantor's knowledge the real property conveyed was qualified for the current agricultural use valuation under section 5713.30 of the Revised Code either for the preceding or the current year; (b) To the extent that the property will not continue to qualify for the current agricultural use valuation either for the current or the succeeding year, that the property will be subject to a recoupment charge equal to the tax savings in accordance with section 5713.34 of the Revised Code; (c) That the grantor and the grantee have considered and accounted for the total estimated amount of such recoupment, if any, to the satisfaction of both the grantee and the grantor. The auditor shall indorse the instrument, forward it to the grantee or the grantee's representative, and provide a copy of the indorsed instrument to the grantor or the grantor's representative. (C) The grantor shall pay the fee required by division divisions (G)(3) and (5) of section 319.54 of the Revised Code; and, in the event the board of county commissioners of the county has levied a real property or a manufactured home transfer tax pursuant to Chapter 322. of the Revised Code, the amount required by the real property or manufactured home transfer tax so levied. If the conveyance is exempt from the fee provided for in division divisions (G)(3) and (5) of section 319.54 of the Revised Code and the tax, if any, levied pursuant to Chapter 322. of the Revised Code, the reason for such exemption shall be shown on the statement. "Value" means, in the case of any deed or certificate of title not a gift in whole or part, the amount of the full consideration therefor, paid or to be paid for the real estate or manufactured or mobile home described in the deed or title, including the amount of any mortgage or vendor's lien thereon. If property sold under a land installment contract is conveyed by the seller under such contract to a third party and the contract has been of record at least twelve months prior to the date of conveyance, "value" means the unpaid balance owed to the seller under the contract at the time of the conveyance, but the statement shall set forth the amount paid under such contract prior to the date of conveyance. In the case of a gift in whole or part, "value" means the estimated price the real estate or manufactured or mobile home described in the deed or certificate of title would bring in the open market and under the then existing and prevailing market conditions in a sale between a willing seller and a willing buyer, both conversant with the property and with prevailing general price levels. No person shall willfully falsify the value of property conveyed. (D) The auditor shall indorse each conveyance on its face to indicate the amount of the conveyance fee and compliance with this section and if the property is residential rental property include a statement that the grantee shall file with the county auditor the information required under division (A) or (C) of section 5323.02 of the Revised Code. The auditor shall retain the original copy of the statement of value, forward to the tax commissioner one copy on which shall be noted the most recent assessed value of the property, and furnish one copy to the grantee or the grantee's representative. (E) In order to achieve uniform administration and collection of the transfer fee required by division divisions (G)(3) and (5) of section 319.54 of the Revised Code, the tax commissioner shall adopt and promulgate rules for the administration and enforcement of the levy and collection of such feefees. (F) As used in this section, "residential rental property" has the same meaning as in section 5323.01 of the Revised Code. Sec. 319.54. (A) On all moneys collected by the county treasurer on any tax duplicate of the county, other than estate tax duplicates, on all property tax relief reimbursements paid to the county under sections 323.156 and 4503.068 and divisions (F) and (I) of section 321.24 of the Revised Code, and on all moneys received as advance payments of personal property and classified property taxes, the county auditor, on settlement with the treasurer and tax commissioner, on or before the date prescribed by law for such settlement or any lawful extension of such date, shall be allowed as compensation for the county auditor's services the following percentages: (1) On the first one hundred thousand dollars, two and one-half per cent; (2) On the next two million dollars, eight thousand three hundred eighteen ten-thousandths of one per cent; (3) On the next two million dollars, six thousand six hundred fifty-five ten-thousandths of one per cent; (4) On all further sums, one thousand six hundred sixty-three ten-thousandths of one per cent. If any settlement is not made on or before the date prescribed by law for such settlement or any lawful extension of such date, the aggregate compensation allowed to the auditor shall be reduced one per cent for each day such settlement is delayed after the prescribed date. No penalty shall apply if the auditor and treasurer grant all requests for advances up to ninety per cent of the settlement pursuant to section 321.34 of the Revised Code. The compensation allowed in accordance with this section on settlements made before the dates prescribed by law, or the reduced compensation allowed in accordance with this section on settlements made after the date prescribed by law or any lawful extension of such date, shall be apportioned ratably by the auditor and deducted from the shares or portions of the revenue payable to the state as well as to the county, townships, municipal corporations, and school districts. (B) For the purpose of reimbursing county auditors for the expenses associated with the increased number of applications for reductions in real property taxes under sections 323.152 and 4503.065 of the Revised Code that result from the amendment of those sections by Am. Sub. H.B. 119 of the 127th general assembly, there shall be paid from the state's general revenue fund to the county treasury, to the credit of the real estate assessment fund created by section 325.31 of the Revised Code, an amount equal to one per cent of the total annual amount of property tax relief reimbursement paid to that county under sections 323.156 and 4503.068 of the Revised Code for the preceding tax year. Payments made under this division shall be made at the same times and in the same manner as payments made under section 323.156 of the Revised Code. (C) From all moneys collected by the county treasurer on any tax duplicate of the county, other than estate tax duplicates, on all property tax relief reimbursements paid to the county under sections 323.156 and 4503.068 and divisions (F) and (I) of section 321.24 of the Revised Code, and on all moneys received as advance payments of personal property and classified property taxes, there shall be paid into the county treasury to the credit of the real estate assessment fund created by section 325.31 of the Revised Code, an amount to be determined by the county auditor, which shall not exceed the percentages prescribed in divisions (C)(1) and (2) of this section. (1) For payments made after June 30, 2007, and before 2011, the following percentages: (a) On the first five hundred thousand dollars, four per cent; (b) On the next five million dollars, two per cent; (c) On the next five million dollars, one per cent; (d) On all further sums not exceeding one hundred fifty million dollars, three-quarters of one per cent; (e) On amounts exceeding one hundred fifty million dollars, five hundred eighty-five thousandths of one per cent. (2) For payments made in or after 2011, the following percentages: (a) On the first five hundred thousand dollars, four per cent; (b) On the next ten million dollars, two per cent; (c) On amounts exceeding ten million five hundred thousand dollars, three-fourths of one per cent. Such compensation shall be apportioned ratably by the auditor and deducted from the shares or portions of the revenue payable to the state as well as to the county, townships, municipal corporations, and school districts. (D) Each county auditor shall receive four per cent of the amount of tax collected and paid into the county treasury, on property omitted and placed by the county auditor on the tax duplicate. (E) On all estate tax moneys collected by the county treasurer, the county auditor, on settlement annually with the tax commissioner, shall be allowed, as compensation for the auditor's services under Chapter 5731. of the Revised Code, two per cent of the amount collected and reported that year in excess of refunds distributed, for the use of the general fund of the county. (F) On all cigarette license moneys collected by the county treasurer, the county auditor, on settlement semiannually with the treasurer, shall be allowed as compensation for the auditor's services in the issuing of such licenses one-half of one per cent of such moneys, to be apportioned ratably and deducted from the shares of the revenue payable to the county and subdivisions, for the use of the general fund of the county. (G) The county auditor shall charge and receive fees as follows: (1) For deeds of land sold for taxes to be paid by the purchaser, five dollars; (2) For the transfer or entry of land, lot, or part of lot, or the transfer or entry on or after January 1, 2000, of a used manufactured home or mobile home as defined in section 5739.0210 of the Revised Code, fifty cents for each transfer or entry, to be paid by the person requiring it; (3) For receiving statements of value and administering section 319.202 of the Revised Code, one dollar, or ten cents for each one hundred dollars or fraction of one hundred dollars, whichever is greater, of the value of the real property transferred or, for sales occurring on or after January 1, 2000, the value of the used manufactured home or used mobile home, as defined in section 5739.0210 of the Revised Code, transferred, except no fee shall be charged when the transfer is made: (a) To or from the United States, this state, or any instrumentality, agency, or political subdivision of the United States or this state; (b) Solely in order to provide or release security for a debt or obligation; (c) To confirm or correct a deed previously executed and recorded, or when a current owner is changing the current owner name listed on any record made available to the general public on the internet, or a publicly accessible database, and the general tax list of real and public utility property, and the general duplicate of real and public utility property, to the initials of the current owner as prescribed in division (C)(1) of section 319.28 of the Revised Code; (d) To evidence a gift, in trust or otherwise and whether revocable or irrevocable, between husband and wife, or parent and child or the spouse of either; (e) On sale for delinquent taxes or assessments; (f) Pursuant to court order, to the extent that such transfer is not the result of a sale effected or completed pursuant to such order; (g) Pursuant to a reorganization of corporations or unincorporated associations or pursuant to the dissolution of a corporation, to the extent that the corporation conveys the property to a stockholder as a distribution in kind of the corporation's assets in exchange for the stockholder's shares in the dissolved corporation; (h) By a subsidiary corporation to its parent corporation for no consideration, nominal consideration, or in sole consideration of the cancellation or surrender of the subsidiary's stock; (i) By lease, whether or not it extends to mineral or mineral rights, unless the lease is for a term of years renewable forever; (j) When the value of the real property or the manufactured or mobile home or the value of the interest that is conveyed does not exceed one hundred dollars; (k) Of an occupied residential property, including a manufactured or mobile home, being transferred to the builder of a new residence or to the dealer of a new manufactured or mobile home when the former residence is traded as part of the consideration for the new residence or new manufactured or mobile home; (l) To a grantee other than a dealer in real property or in manufactured or mobile homes, solely for the purpose of, and as a step in, the prompt sale of the real property or manufactured or mobile home to others; (m) To or from a person when no money or other valuable and tangible consideration readily convertible into money is paid or to be paid for the real estate or manufactured or mobile home and the transaction is not a gift; (n) Pursuant to division (B) of section 317.22 of the Revised Code, or section 2113.61 of the Revised Code, between spouses or to a surviving spouse pursuant to section 5302.17 of the Revised Code as it existed prior to April 4, 1985, between persons pursuant to section 5302.17 or 5302.18 of the Revised Code on or after April 4, 1985, to a person who is a surviving, survivorship tenant pursuant to section 5302.17 of the Revised Code on or after April 4, 1985, or pursuant to section 5309.45 of the Revised Code; (o) To a trustee acting on behalf of minor children of the deceased; (p) Of an easement or right-of-way when the value of the interest conveyed does not exceed one thousand dollars; (q) Of property sold to a surviving spouse pursuant to section 2106.16 of the Revised Code; (r) To or from an organization exempt from federal income taxation under section 501(c)(3) of the "Internal Revenue Code of 1986," 100 Stat. 2085, 26 U.S.C.A. 1, as amended, provided such transfer is without consideration and is in furtherance of the charitable or public purposes of such organization; (s) Among the heirs at law or devisees, including a surviving spouse, of a common decedent, when no consideration in money is paid or to be paid for the real property or manufactured or mobile home; (t) To a trustee of a trust, when the grantor of the trust has reserved an unlimited power to revoke the trust; (u) To the grantor of a trust by a trustee of the trust, when the transfer is made to the grantor pursuant to the exercise of the grantor's power to revoke the trust or to withdraw trust assets; (v) To the beneficiaries of a trust if the fee was paid on the transfer from the grantor of the trust to the trustee or if the transfer is made pursuant to trust provisions which became irrevocable at the death of the grantor; (w) To a corporation for incorporation into a sports facility constructed pursuant to section 307.696 of the Revised Code; (x) Between persons pursuant to section 5302.18 of the Revised Code; (y) From a county land reutilization corporation organized under Chapter 1724. of the Revised Code, or its wholly owned subsidiary, to a third party. (4) For the cost of publishing the delinquent manufactured home tax list, the delinquent tax list, and the delinquent vacant land tax list, a flat fee, as determined by the county auditor, to be charged to the owner of a home on the delinquent manufactured home tax list or the property owner of land on the delinquent tax list or the delinquent vacant land tax list. (5) For the purpose of subsidizing college and university tuition, a fee equal to one per cent of the value of the real property transferred on or after the effective date of this amendment that is classified as to use as residential property, provided that the value of the property exceeds two million dollars. No such fee shall be charged when the transfer is made under any of the circumstances described in divisions (G)(3)(a) to (y) of this section. (H) The auditor shall compute and collect the feefees. The auditor shall maintain a numbered receipt system, as prescribed by the tax commissioner, and use such receipt system to provide a receipt to each person paying a fee. The auditor shall deposit the receipts of the fees on conveyances in the county treasury daily to the credit of the general fund of the county, except that fees as follows: (1) Fees charged and received under division (G)(3) of this section for a transfer of real property to a county land reutilization corporation shall be credited to the county land reutilization corporation fund established under section 321.263 of the Revised Code. (2) Fees charged and received under division (G)(5) of this section shall be remitted to the treasurer of state and credited to the Ohio free college fund created in section 3345.012 of the Revised Code. The real property transfer fee provided for in division (G)(3) of this section shall be applicable to any conveyance of real property presented to the auditor on or after January 1, 1968, regardless of its time of execution or delivery. The transfer fee for a used manufactured home or used mobile home shall be computed by and paid to the county auditor of the county in which the home is located immediately prior to the transfer. Sec. 3345.012. As used in this section, "state institution of higher education" has the same meaning as in section 3345.011 of the Revised Code. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, beginning with the academic year immediately following the effective date of this section, no state institution of higher education shall charge instructional, general, or special fees to a student who is a resident of this state under rules adopted under section 3333.31 of the Revised Code. Each state institution shall provide a free higher education to any such student it accepts for enrollment for the equivalent of eight semesters. The chancellor of higher education shall develop a method to distribute to state institutions annually the funds appropriated by the general assembly to subsidize the costs incurred under this section. The Ohio free college fund is established in the state treasury, consisting of such amounts designated for the purposes of the fund by the general assembly. The fund shall be administered by the chancellor and be used to distribute funds under this section. The fund also may be used by the chancellor to cover the costs of administering this section. The chancellor shall adopt rules to implement this section. Sec. 5747.02. (A) For the purpose of providing revenue for the support of schools and local government functions, to provide relief to property taxpayers, to provide revenue for the general revenue fund, and to meet the expenses of administering the tax levied by this chapter, there is hereby levied on every individual, trust, and estate residing in or earning or receiving income in this state, on every individual, trust, and estate earning or receiving lottery winnings, prizes, or awards pursuant to Chapter 3770. of the Revised Code, on every individual, trust, and estate earning or receiving winnings on casino or sports gaming, and on every individual, trust, and estate otherwise having nexus with or in this state under the Constitution of the United States, an annual tax measured as prescribed in divisions (A)(1) to (4) of this section. (1) In the case of trusts, the tax imposed by this section shall be measured by modified Ohio taxable income under division (D) of this section and levied in the same amount as the tax is imposed on estates as prescribed in division (A)(2) of this section. (2) In the case of estates, the tax imposed by this section shall be measured by Ohio taxable income. The tax shall be levied at the rate of 1.38462% for the first twenty-six thousand fifty dollars of such income and, for income in excess of that amount, the tax shall be levied at the same rates prescribed in division (A)(3) of this section for individuals. (3) In the case of individuals, the tax imposed by this section on income other than taxable business income shall be measured by Ohio adjusted gross income, less taxable business income and less an exemption for the taxpayer, the taxpayer's spouse, and each dependent as provided in section 5747.025 of the Revised Code. If the balance thus obtained is equal to or less than twenty-six thousand fifty dollars, no tax shall be imposed on that balance. If the balance thus obtained is greater than twenty-six thousand fifty dollars, the tax is hereby levied as follows: (a) For taxable years beginning in 2023: 1 2 A OHIO ADJUSTED GROSS INCOME LESS TAXABLE BUSINESS INCOME AND EXEMPTIONS (INDIVIDUALS) OR MODIFIED OHIO TAXABLE INCOME (TRUSTS) OR OHIO TAXABLE INCOME (ESTATES) TAX B More than $26,050 but not more than $100,000 $360.69 plus 2.75% of the amount in excess of $26,050 C More than $100,000 but not more than $115,300 $2,394.32 plus 3.688% of the amount in excess of $100,000 D More than $115,300 $2,958.58 plus 3.75% of the amount in excess of $115,300 (b) For taxable years beginning in 2024 and thereafter: 1 2 A OHIO ADJUSTED GROSS INCOME LESS TAXABLE BUSINESS INCOME AND EXEMPTIONS (INDIVIDUALS) OR MODIFIED OHIO TAXABLE INCOME (TRUSTS) OR OHIO TAXABLE INCOME (ESTATES) TAX B More than $26,050 but not more than $100,000 $360.69 plus 2.75% of the amount in excess of $26,050 C More than $100,000 $2,394.32 plus 3.5% of the amount in excess of $100,000 (4)(a) In the case of individuals, the tax imposed by this section on taxable business income shall equal three per cent of the result obtained by subtracting any amount allowed under division (A)(4)(b) of this section from the individual's taxable business income. (b) If the exemptions allowed to an individual under division (A)(3) of this section exceed the taxpayer's Ohio adjusted gross income less taxable business income, the excess shall be deducted from taxable business income before computing the tax under division (A)(4)(a) of this section. (5) Except as otherwise provided in this division, in August of each year, the tax commissioner shall make a new adjustment to the income amounts prescribed in divisions (A)(2) and (3) of this section by multiplying the percentage increase in the gross domestic product deflator computed that year under section 5747.025 of the Revised Code by each of the income amounts resulting from the adjustment under this division in the preceding year, adding the resulting product to the corresponding income amount resulting from the adjustment in the preceding year, and rounding the resulting sum to the nearest multiple of fifty dollars. The tax commissioner also shall recompute each of the tax dollar amounts to the extent necessary to reflect the new adjustment of the income amounts. To recompute the tax dollar amount corresponding to the lowest tax rate in division (A)(3) of this section, the commissioner shall multiply the tax rate prescribed in division (A)(2) of this section by the income amount specified in that division and as adjusted according to this paragraph. The rates of taxation shall not be adjusted. The adjusted amounts apply to taxable years beginning in the calendar year in which the adjustments are made and to taxable years beginning in each ensuing calendar year until a calendar year in which a new adjustment is made pursuant to this division. The tax commissioner shall not make a new adjustment in any year in which the amount resulting from the adjustment would be less than the amount resulting from the adjustment in the preceding year. (B) If the director of budget and management makes a certification to the tax commissioner under division (B) of section 131.44 of the Revised Code, the amount of tax as determined under divisions (A)(1) to (3) of this section shall be reduced by the percentage prescribed in that certification for taxable years beginning in the calendar year in which that certification is made. (C)(1) The tax imposed by this section on a trust shall be computed by multiplying the Ohio modified taxable income of the trust by the rates prescribed by division (A) of this section. (2) A resident trust may claim a credit against the tax computed under division (C) of this section equal to the lesser of (a) the tax paid to another state or the District of Columbia on the resident trust's modified nonbusiness income, other than the portion of the resident trust's nonbusiness income that is qualifying investment income as defined in section 5747.012 of the Revised Code, or (b) the effective tax rate, based on modified Ohio taxable income, multiplied by the resident trust's modified nonbusiness income other than the portion of the resident trust's nonbusiness income that is qualifying investment income. The credit applies before any other applicable credits. (3) Any credit authorized against the tax imposed by this section applies to a trust subject to division (C) of this section only if the trust otherwise qualifies for the credit. To the extent that the trust distributes income for the taxable year for which a credit is available to the trust, the credit shall be shared by the trust and its beneficiaries. The tax commissioner and the trust shall be guided by applicable regulations of the United States treasury regarding the sharing of credits. (D) For the purposes of this section, "trust" means any trust described in Subchapter J of Chapter 1 of the Internal Revenue Code, excluding trusts that are not irrevocable as defined in division (I)(3)(b) of section 5747.01 of the Revised Code and that have no modified Ohio taxable income for the taxable year, charitable remainder trusts, qualified funeral trusts and preneed funeral contract trusts established pursuant to sections 4717.31 to 4717.38 of the Revised Code that are not qualified funeral trusts, endowment and perpetual care trusts, qualified settlement trusts and funds, designated settlement trusts and funds, and trusts exempted from taxation under section 501(a) of the Internal Revenue Code. (E) Nothing in division (A)(3) of this section shall prohibit an individual with an Ohio adjusted gross income, less taxable business income and exemptions, of twenty-six thousand fifty dollars or less from filing a return under this chapter to receive a refund of taxes withheld or to claim any refundable credit allowed under this chapter. (F)(1) For the purpose of subsidizing college and university tuition, an annual tax is levied on every individual, trust, and estate subject to the tax levied under division (A) of this section that has a modified adjusted gross income, less exemptions; modified Ohio taxable income; or Ohio taxable income of more than five hundred thousand dollars, as follows: (a) For taxable years beginning in 2025: 1 2 A MODIFIED ADJUSTED GROSS INCOME LESS EXEMPTIONS (INDIVIDUALS) OR MODIFIED OHIO TAXABLE INCOME (TRUSTS) OR OHIO TAXABLE INCOME (ESTATES) TAX B More than $500,000 but not more than $1,000,000 5.375% of the amount in excess of $500,000 C More than $1,000,000 $26,875 plus 7.375% of the amount in excess of $1,000,000 (b) For taxable years beginning in 2026 or thereafter: 1 2 A MODIFIED ADJUSTED GROSS INCOME LESS EXEMPTIONS (INDIVIDUALS) OR MODIFIED OHIO TAXABLE INCOME (TRUSTS) OR OHIO TAXABLE INCOME (ESTATES) TAX B More than $500,000 but not more than $1,000,000 5.75% of the amount in excess of $500,000 C More than $1,000,000 $28,750 plus 7.5% of the amount in excess of $1,000,000 (2) The tax levied under division (F) of this section shall be, for all purposes, administered and enforced in the same manner and subject to the same provisions as a tax levied under division (A) of this section. Sec. 5747.03. (A)(1) All money collected under this chapter arising from the taxes imposed by section 5747.02, 5747.38, or 5747.41 of the Revised Code, except the tax levied under division (F) of section 5747.02 of the Revised Code, shall be credited to the general revenue fund and distributed pursuant to division (F) of section 321.24 and section 323.156 of the Revised Code; to make subsidy payments to institutions of higher education from appropriations to the department of higher education; to support expenditures for programs and services for persons with mental illnesses, persons with developmental disabilities, and the elderly; for primary and secondary education; for medical assistance; and for any other purposes authorized by law, subject to the limitation that at least fifty per cent of the income tax collected by the state from the tax imposed by section 5747.02 of the Revised Code shall be returned pursuant to Section 9 of Article XII, Ohio Constitution. (2) To ensure that such constitutional requirement is satisfied the tax commissioner shall, on or before the thirtieth day of June of each year, from the best information available to the tax commissioner, determine and certify for each county to the director of budget and management the amount of taxes collected under this chapter from the tax imposed under section 5747.02 of the Revised Code during the preceding calendar year that are required to be returned to the county by Section 9 of Article XII, Ohio Constitution. The director shall provide for payment from the general revenue fund to the county in the amount, if any, that the sum of the amount so certified for that county exceeds the sum of the following: (a) The sum of the payments from the general revenue fund for the preceding calendar year credited to the county's undivided income tax fund pursuant to division (F) of section 321.24 and section 323.156 of the Revised Code or made directly from the general revenue fund to political subdivisions located in the county; (b) The sum of the amounts from the general revenue fund distributed in the county during the preceding calendar year for subsidy payments to institutions of higher education from appropriations to the department of higher education; for programs and services for persons with mental illnesses, persons with developmental disabilities, and elderly persons; for primary and secondary education; and for medical assistance. (c) In the case of payments made by the director under this division in 2007, the total amount distributed to the county during the preceding calendar year from the local government fund and the local government revenue assistance fund, and, in the case of payments made by the director under this division in subsequent calendar years, the amount distributed to the county from the local government fund; (d) In the case of payments made by the director under this division, the total amount distributed to the county during the preceding calendar year from the public library fund. Payments under this division shall be credited to the county's undivided income tax fund, except that, notwithstanding section 5705.14 of the Revised Code, such payments may be transferred by the board of county commissioners to the county general fund by resolution adopted with the affirmative vote of two-thirds of the members thereof. (B) All payments received in each month from taxes imposed under Chapter 5748. of the Revised Code and any penalties or interest thereon shall be paid into the school district income tax fund, which is hereby created in the state treasury, except that an amount equal to the following portion of such payments shall be paid into the general school district income tax administrative fund, which is hereby created in the state treasury: (1) One and three-quarters of one per cent of those received in fiscal year 1996; (2) One and one-half per cent of those received in fiscal year 1997 and thereafter. Money in the school district income tax administrative fund shall be used by the tax commissioner to defray costs incurred in administering the school district's income tax, including the cost of providing employers with information regarding the rate of tax imposed by any school district. Any moneys remaining in the fund after such use shall be deposited in the school district income tax fund. All interest earned on moneys in the school district income tax fund shall be credited to the fund. (C)(1)(a) Within thirty days of the end of each calendar quarter ending on the last day of March, June, September, and December, the director of budget and management shall make a payment from the school district income tax fund to each school district for which school district income tax revenue was received during that quarter. The amount of the payment shall equal the balance in the school district's account at the end of that quarter. (b) After a school district ceases to levy an income tax, the director of budget and management shall adjust the payments under division (C)(1)(a) of this section to retain sufficient money in the school district's account to pay refunds. For the calendar quarters ending on the last day of March and December of the calendar year following the last calendar year the tax is levied, the director shall make the payments in the amount required under division (C)(1)(a) of this section. For the calendar quarter ending on the last day of June of the calendar year following the last calendar year the tax is levied, the director shall make a payment equal to nine-tenths of the balance in the account at the end of that quarter. For the calendar quarter ending on the last day of September of the calendar year following the last calendar year the tax is levied, the director shall make no payment. For the second and succeeding calendar years following the last calendar year the tax is levied, the director shall make one payment each year, within thirty days of the last day of June, in an amount equal to the balance in the district's account on the last day of June. (2) Moneys paid to a school district under this division shall be deposited in its school district income tax fund. All interest earned on moneys in the school district income tax fund shall be apportioned by the tax commissioner pro rata among the school districts in the proportions and at the times the districts are entitled to receive payments under this division. (D) All revenue from the tax levied under division (F) of section 5747.02 of the Revised Code shall be credited to the Ohio free college fund created in section 3345.012 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5747.07. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Partial weekly withholding period" means a period during which an employer directly, indirectly, or constructively pays compensation to, or credits compensation to the benefit of, an employee, and that consists of a consecutive Saturday, Sunday, Monday, and Tuesday or a consecutive Wednesday, Thursday, and Friday. There are two partial weekly withholding periods each week, except that a partial weekly withholding period cannot extend from one calendar year into the next calendar year; if the first day of January falls on a day other than Saturday or Wednesday, the partial weekly withholding period ends on the thirty-first day of December and there are three partial weekly withholding periods during that week. (2) "Undeposited taxes" means the taxes an employer is required to deduct and withhold from an employee's compensation pursuant to section 5747.06 of the Revised Code that have not been remitted to the tax commissioner pursuant to this section or section 5747.072 of the Revised Code. (3) A "week" begins on Saturday and concludes at the end of the following Friday. (4) "Professional employer organization," "professional employer organization agreement," and "professional employer organization reporting entity" have the same meanings as in section 4125.01 of the Revised Code. (5) "Alternate employer organization" and "alternate employer organization agreement" have the same meanings as in section 4133.01 of the Revised Code. (6) "Client employer" has the same meaning as in section 4125.01 of the Revised Code in the context of a professional employer organization or a professional employer organization reporting entity, or the same meaning as in section 4133.01 of the Revised Code in the context of an alternate employer organization. (B) Except as provided in divisions (C) and (D) of this section and in division (A) of section 5747.072 of the Revised Code, every employer required to deduct and withhold any amount under section 5747.06 of the Revised Code shall file a return and shall pay the amount required by law as follows: (1) An employer who accumulates or is required to accumulate undeposited taxes of one hundred thousand dollars or more during a partial weekly withholding period shall make the payment of the undeposited taxes by the close of the first banking day after the day on which the accumulation reaches one hundred thousand dollars. If required under division (I) of this section, the payment shall be made electronically under section 5747.072 of the Revised Code. (2) Except as required by division (B)(1) of this section, an employer whose actual or required payments under this section were at least eighty-four thousand dollars during the twelve-month period ending on the thirtieth day of June of the preceding calendar year shall make the payment of undeposited taxes within three banking days after the close of a partial weekly withholding period during which the employer was required to deduct and withhold any amount under this chapter. If required under division (I) of this section, the payment shall be made electronically under section 5747.072 of the Revised Code. (3) Except as required by divisions (B)(1) and (2) of this section, if an employer's actual or required payments were more than two thousand dollars during the twelve-month period ending on the thirtieth day of June of the preceding calendar year, the employer shall make the payment of undeposited taxes for each month during which they were required to be withheld no later than fifteen days following the last day of that month. The employer shall file the return prescribed by the tax commissioner with the payment. (4) Except as required by divisions (B)(1), (2), and (3) of this section, an employer shall make the payment of undeposited taxes for each calendar quarter during which they were required to be withheld no later than the last day of the month following the last day of March, June, September, and December each year. The employer shall file the return prescribed by the tax commissioner with the payment. (C) The return and payment schedules prescribed by divisions (B)(1) and (2) of this section do not apply to the return and payment of undeposited school district income taxes arising from taxes levied pursuant to Chapter 5748. of the Revised Code. Undeposited school district income taxes shall be returned and paid pursuant to divisions (B)(3) and (4) of this section, as applicable. (D)(1) The requirements of division (B) of this section are met if the amount paid is not less than ninety-five per cent of the actual tax withheld or required to be withheld for the prior quarterly, monthly, or partial weekly withholding period, and the underpayment is not due to willful neglect. Any underpayment of withheld tax shall be paid within thirty days of the date on which the withheld tax was due without regard to division (D)(1) of this section. An employer described in division (B)(1) or (2) of this section shall make the payment electronically under section 5747.072 of the Revised Code. (2) If the tax commissioner believes that quarterly or monthly payments would result in a delay that might jeopardize the remittance of withholding payments, the commissioner may order that the payments be made weekly, or more frequently if necessary, and the payments shall be made no later than three banking days following the close of the period for which the jeopardy order is made. An order requiring weekly or more frequent payments shall be delivered to the employer in the manner provided in section 5703.37 of the Revised Code and remains in effect until the commissioner notifies the employer to the contrary. (3) If compelling circumstances exist concerning the remittance of undeposited taxes, the commissioner may order the employer to make payments under any of the payment schedules under division (B) of this section. The order shall be delivered to the employer in the manner provided in section 5703.37 of the Revised Code and shall remain in effect until the commissioner notifies the employer to the contrary. For purposes of division (D)(3) of this section, "compelling circumstances" exist if either or both of the following are true: (a) Based upon annualization of payments made or required to be made during the preceding calendar year and during the current calendar year, the employer would be required for the next calendar year to make payments under division (B)(2) of this section. (b) Based upon annualization of payments made or required to be made during the current calendar year, the employer would be required for the next calendar year to make payments under division (B)(2) of this section. (E)(1) In addition to other returns required to be filed and payments required to be made under this section, every employer required to deduct and withhold taxes shall file, not later than the thirty-first day of January of each year, an annual return covering, but not limited to, both the aggregate amount deducted and withheld and the aggregate amount required to be deducted and withheld during the entire preceding year for the tax imposed under section 5747.02 of the Revised Code and for each tax imposed under Chapter 5748. of the Revised Code. At the time of filing that return, the employer shall pay over any amounts of undeposited taxes for the preceding year, whether actually deducted and withheld or required to be deducted and withheld, that have not been previously paid. The employer shall make the annual report, to each employee and to the tax commissioner, of the compensation paid and each tax withheld, as the commissioner by rule may prescribe. (2) Each employer required to deduct and withhold any tax is liable for the payment of that amount required to be deducted and withheld, whether or not the tax has in fact been withheld, unless the failure to withhold was based upon the employer's good faith in reliance upon the statement of the employee as to liability, and the amount shall be deemed to be a special fund in trust for the general revenue fund. (F) Each employer shall file with the employer's annual return the following items of information on employees for whom withholding is required under section 5747.06 of the Revised Code: (1) The full name of each employee, the employee's address, the employee's school district of residence, and in the case of a nonresident employee, the employee's principal county of employment; (2) The social security number of each employee; (3) The total amount of compensation paid before any deductions to each employee for the period for which the annual return is made; (4) The amount of the tax imposed by section 5747.02 of the Revised Code and the amount of each tax imposed under Chapter 5748. of the Revised Code withheld from the compensation of the employee for the period for which the annual return is made. The commissioner may extend upon good cause the period for filing any notice or return required to be filed under this section and may adopt rules relating to extensions of time. If the extension results in an extension of time for the payment of the amounts withheld with respect to which the return is filed, the employer shall pay, at the time the amount withheld is paid, an amount of interest computed at the rate per annum prescribed by section 5703.47 of the Revised Code on that amount withheld, from the day that amount was originally required to be paid to the day of actual payment or to the day an assessment is issued under section 5747.13 of the Revised Code, whichever occurs first. (5) In addition to all other interest charges and penalties imposed, all amounts of taxes withheld or required to be withheld and remaining unpaid after the day the amounts are required to be paid shall bear interest from the date prescribed for payment at the rate per annum prescribed by section 5703.47 of the Revised Code on the amount unpaid, in addition to the amount withheld, until paid or until the day an assessment is issued under section 5747.13 of the Revised Code, whichever occurs first. (G) An employee of a corporation, limited liability company, or business trust having control or supervision of or charged with the responsibility of filing the report and making payment, or an officer, member, manager, or trustee of a corporation, limited liability company, or business trust who is responsible for the execution of the corporation's, limited liability company's, or business trust's fiscal responsibilities, shall be personally liable for failure to file the report or pay the tax due as required by this section. The dissolution, termination, or bankruptcy of a corporation, limited liability company, or business trust does not discharge a responsible officer's, member's, manager's, employee's, or trustee's liability for a failure of the corporation, limited liability company, or business trust to file returns or pay tax due. (H) If an employer required to deduct and withhold income tax from compensation and to pay that tax to the state under sections 5747.06 and 5747.07 of the Revised Code sells the employer's business or stock of merchandise or quits the employer's business, the taxes required to be deducted and withheld and paid to the state pursuant to those sections prior to that time, together with any interest and penalties imposed on those taxes, become due and payable immediately, and that person shall make a final return within fifteen days after the date of selling or quitting business. The employer's successor shall withhold a sufficient amount of the purchase money to cover the amount of the taxes, interest, and penalties due and unpaid, until the former owner produces a receipt from the tax commissioner showing that the taxes, interest, and penalties have been paid or a certificate indicating that no such taxes are due. If the purchaser of the business or stock of merchandise fails to withhold purchase money, the purchaser shall be personally liable for the payment of the taxes, interest, and penalties accrued and unpaid during the operation of the business by the former owner. If the amount of taxes, interest, and penalties outstanding at the time of the purchase exceeds the total purchase money, the tax commissioner in the commissioner's discretion may adjust the liability of the seller or the responsibility of the purchaser to pay that liability to maximize the collection of withholding tax revenue. (I) An employer whose actual or required payments under this section exceeded eighty-four thousand dollars during the twelve-month period ending on the thirtieth day of June of the preceding calendar year shall make all payments required by this section for the year electronically under section 5747.072 of the Revised Code. (J)(1) Every professional employer organization, professional employer organization reporting entity, and alternate employer organization shall file a report with the tax commissioner within thirty days after commencing business in this state that includes all of the following information: (a) The name, address, number the employer receives from the secretary of state to do business in this state, if applicable, and federal employer identification number of each client employer of the organization or entity; (b) The date that each client employer became a client of the organization or entity; (c) The names and mailing addresses of the chief executive officer and the chief financial officer of each client employer for taxation of the client employer. (2) Beginning with the calendar quarter ending after a professional employer organization, professional employer organization reporting entity, or alternate employer organization files the report required under division (J)(1) of this section, and every calendar quarter thereafter, the organization or entity shall file an updated report with the tax commissioner. The organization or entity shall file the updated report not later than the last day of the month following the end of the calendar quarter and shall include all of the following information in the report: (a) If an entity became a client employer of the professional employer organization, professional employer organization reporting entity, or alternate employer organization at any time during the calendar quarter, all of the information required under division (J)(1) of this section for each new client employer; (b) If an entity terminated the professional employer organization agreement or the alternate employer organization agreement between the entity and the professional employer organization, professional employer organization reporting entity, or alternate employer organization, as applicable, at any time during the calendar quarter, the information described in division (J)(1)(a) of this section for that entity, the date during the calendar quarter that the entity ceased being a client of the organization or reporting entity, if applicable, or the date the entity ceased business operations in this state, if applicable; (c) If the name or mailing address of the chief executive officer or the chief financial officer of a client employer has changed since the professional employer organization, professional employer organization reporting entity, or alternate employer organization previously submitted a report under division (J)(1) or (2) of this section, the updated name or mailing address, or both, of the chief executive officer or the chief financial officer, as applicable; (d) If none of the events described in divisions (J)(2)(a) to (c) of this section occurred during the calendar quarter, a statement of that fact. (K) For the purpose of subsidizing college and university tuition, a tax is levied on each employer required to withhold and remit amounts under this section and section 5747.06 of the Revised Code. The tax shall equal one-half of one per cent of the amount of compensation in excess of ten million dollars for the calendar year for which such withholding and remission under this section is required. The tax shall be paid by the employer at the same time and in the same manner as withheld amounts are required to be paid under this section. Except as otherwise provided in this division, the tax shall be considered a tax levied under section 5747.02 of the Revised Code for all purposes of this chapter. All revenue from the tax shall be credited to the Ohio free college fund created in section 3345.012 of the Revised Code. Section 2. That existing sections 319.202, 319.54, 5747.02, 5747.03, and 5747.07 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed. Section 3. The amendment by this act of section 5747.02 of the Revised Code applies to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2025. Section 4. The General Assembly, applying the principle stated in division (B) of section 1.52 of the Revised Code that amendments are to be harmonized if reasonably capable of simultaneous operation, finds that the following sections, presented in this act as composites of the sections as amended by the acts indicated, are the resulting versions of the sections in effect prior to the effective date of the sections as presented in this act: Section 319.54 of the Revised Code as amended by both H.B. 265 and H.B. 496 of the 135th General Assembly. Section 5747.03 of the Revised Code as amended by H.B. 281 and S.B. 246 all of the 134th General Assembly.